Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 547. MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE SERVICES

SUBCHAPTER A. DELIVERY OF MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE SERVICES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0001. EVALUATION OF CERTAIN CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS. (a) To ensure the appropriate delivery of mental health and substance use services, the commission shall regularly evaluate program contractors and subcontractors that provide or arrange services for individuals enrolled in:

(1) the Medicaid managed care program; and

(2) the child health plan program.

(b) The commission shall monitor:

(1) penetration rates as those rates relate to mental health and substance use services provided by or through contractors and subcontractors;

(2) utilization rates as those rates relate to mental health and substance use services provided by or through contractors and subcontractors; and

(3) provider networks used by contractors and subcontractors to provide mental health or substance use services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0002. OMBUDSMAN FOR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ACCESS TO CARE. (a) In this section, "ombudsman" means the individual designated under this section by the executive commissioner as the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care unless the context requires otherwise.

(b) The executive commissioner shall designate an ombudsman for behavioral health access to care.

(c) The ombudsman is administratively attached to the commission's office of the ombudsman established under Section 523.0255.

(d) The commission may use an alternate title for the ombudsman in consumer-facing materials if the commission determines that an alternate title would benefit consumer understanding or access.

(e) The ombudsman serves as a neutral party to help consumers, including consumers who are uninsured or have public or private health benefit coverage, and behavioral health care providers navigate and resolve issues related to consumer access to behavioral health care, including care for mental health conditions and substance use disorders.

(f) The ombudsman shall:

(1) interact with consumers and behavioral health care providers regarding concerns or complaints to help the consumers and providers resolve behavioral health care access issues;

(2) identify, track, and help report potential violations of state or federal rules, regulations, or statutes concerning the availability of, and terms and conditions of, benefits for mental health conditions or substance use disorders, including potential violations related to quantitative and nonquantitative treatment limitations;

(3) report concerns, complaints, and potential violations described by Subdivision (2) to the appropriate regulatory or oversight agency;

(4) receive and report concerns and complaints relating to inappropriate care or mental health commitment;

(5) provide appropriate information to help consumers obtain behavioral health care;

(6) develop appropriate points of contact for referrals to other state and federal agencies; and

(7) provide appropriate information to help consumers or providers file appeals or complaints with the appropriate entities, including insurers and other state and federal agencies.

(g) The Texas Department of Insurance shall appoint a liaison to the ombudsman to receive the reports of concerns, complaints, and potential violations described by Subsection (f)(2) from the ombudsman, consumers, or behavioral health care providers.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0003. RULES GOVERNING PEER SPECIALISTS. (a) With input from mental health and substance use peer specialists, the commission shall develop and the executive commissioner shall adopt:

(1) rules establishing training requirements for peer specialists to provide services to individuals with mental illness or individuals with substance use conditions;

(2) rules establishing certification and supervision requirements for peer specialists;

(3) rules defining the scope of services that peer specialists may provide;

(4) rules distinguishing peer services from other services that a person must hold a license to provide; and

(5) any other rules necessary to protect the health and safety of individuals receiving peer services.

(b) The executive commissioner may not adopt rules under this section that preclude the provision of mental health rehabilitative services under 25 T.A.C. Chapter 416, Subchapter A, as that subchapter existed on January 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

For expiration of this section, see Subsection (e).

Sec. 547.0004. VETERAN SUICIDE PREVENTION ACTION PLAN.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) The commission, in collaboration with the Texas Coordinating Council for Veterans Services, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Service Members, Veterans, and their Families Technical Assistance Center Implementation Academy of the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, veteran advocacy groups, health care providers, and any other organization or interested party the commission considers appropriate, shall develop a comprehensive action plan to increase access to and availability of professional veteran health services to prevent veteran suicides.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(b) The action plan must:

(1) identify opportunities for raising awareness of and providing resources for veteran suicide prevention;

(2) identify opportunities to increase access to veteran mental health services;

(3) identify funding resources to provide accessible, affordable veteran mental health services;

(4) provide measures to expand public-private partnerships to ensure access to quality, timely mental health services;

(5) provide for proactive outreach measures to reach veterans needing care;

(6) provide for peer-to-peer service coordination, including training, certification, recertification, and continuing education for peer coordinators; and

(7) address suicide prevention awareness, measures, and training regarding veterans involved in the justice system.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(c) The commission shall make specific long-term statutory, administrative, and budget-related recommendations to the legislature and the governor regarding the policy initiatives and reforms necessary to implement the action plan developed under this section. The initiatives and reforms in the long-term plan must be fully implemented by September 1, 2027.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(d) The commission shall include in the commission's strategic plan under Chapter 2056 the plans for implementing the long-term recommendations under Subsection (c).

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(e) This section expires September 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0005. LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITY GROUP REGIONAL STRATEGIES; ANNUAL REPORT. (a) In this section, "local mental health authority group" means a group of local mental health authorities established by the commission under Chapter 963 (S.B. 633), Acts of the 86th Legislature, Regular Session, 2019.

(b) The commission shall require each local mental health authority group to meet at least quarterly to collaborate on planning and implementing regional strategies to reduce:

(1) costs to local governments of providing services to individuals experiencing a mental health crisis;

(2) transportation to mental health facilities of individuals served by an authority that is a member of the group;

(3) incarceration of individuals with mental illness in county jails located in an area served by an authority that is a member of the group; and

(4) visits by individuals with mental illness at hospital emergency rooms located in an area served by an authority that is a member of the group.

(c) The commission shall use federal funds in accordance with state and federal guidelines to implement this section.

(d) The commission, in coordination with each local mental health authority group, shall annually update the mental health services development plan that was initially developed by the commission and each local mental health authority group under Chapter 963 (S.B. 633), Acts of the 86th Legislature, Regular Session, 2019. The commission and each group's updated plan must include a description of:

(1) actions taken by the group to implement regional strategies in the plan; and

(2) new regional strategies identified by the group to reduce the circumstances described by Subsection (b), including the estimated number of outpatient and inpatient beds necessary to meet the goals of each group's regional strategy.

(e) Not later than December 1 of each year, the commission shall produce and publish on the commission's Internet website a report containing the most recent version of each mental health services development plan developed by the commission and a local mental health authority group.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER B. TEXAS SYSTEM OF CARE FRAMEWORK

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Minor" means an individual younger than 18 years of age.

(2) "Serious emotional disturbance" means a mental, behavioral, or emotional disorder of sufficient duration to result in functional impairment that substantially interferes with or limits an individual's role or ability to function in family, school, or community activities.

(3) "System of care framework" means a framework for collaboration among state agencies, minors who have a serious emotional disturbance or are at risk of developing a serious emotional disturbance, and the families of those minors that improves access to services and delivers effective community-based services that are family-driven, youth- or young adult-guided, and culturally and linguistically competent.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0052. TEXAS SYSTEM OF CARE FRAMEWORK. (a) The commission shall implement a system of care framework to develop local mental health systems of care in communities for minors who:

(1) have or are at risk of developing a serious emotional disturbance;

(2) are receiving residential mental health services and supports or inpatient mental health hospitalization; or

(3) are at risk of being removed from the minor's home and placed in a more restrictive environment to receive mental health services and supports, including:

(A) an inpatient mental health hospital;

(B) a residential treatment facility; or

(C) a facility or program operated by the Department of Family and Protective Services or an agency that is part of the juvenile justice system.

(b) The commission shall:

(1) maintain a comprehensive plan for the delivery of mental health services and supports to a minor and a minor's family using a system of care framework, including best practices in the financing, administration, governance, and delivery of those services;

(2) enter into memoranda of understanding with the Department of State Health Services, the Department of Family and Protective Services, the Texas Education Agency, the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, and the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments that specify the roles and responsibilities of each agency in implementing the comprehensive plan;

(3) identify appropriate local, state, and federal funding sources to finance infrastructure and mental health services and supports necessary to support state and local system of care framework efforts; and

(4) develop an evaluation system to measure cross-system performance and outcomes of state and local system of care framework efforts.

(c) In implementing this section, the commission shall consult with stakeholders, including:

(1) minors who have or are at risk of developing a serious emotional disturbance or young adults who received mental health services and supports as a minor with or at risk of developing a serious emotional disturbance; and

(2) family members of those minors or young adults.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0053. IMPLEMENTATION. The commission shall:

(1) monitor the implementation of a system of care framework under Section 547.0052; and

(2) adopt rules necessary to facilitate or adjust that implementation.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0054. TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR LOCAL SYSTEMS OF CARE. The commission may provide technical assistance to a community that implements a local system of care.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER C. SERVICES FOR CHILDREN WITH SEVERE EMOTIONAL DISTURBANCES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Children with severe emotional disturbances" includes children:

(A) who are at risk of incarceration or placement in a residential mental health facility;

(B) who are students in a special education program under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, Education Code;

(C) with a substance use disorder or a developmental disability; and

(D) for whom a court may appoint the Department of Family and Protective Services as managing conservator.

(2) "Community resource coordination group" means a coordination group established under a memorandum of understanding adopted under Subchapter D, Chapter 522.

(3) "Systems of care services" means a comprehensive state system of mental health services and other necessary and related services that is organized as a coordinated network to meet the multiple and changing needs of children with severe emotional disturbances and their families.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0102. EVALUATIONS BY COMMUNITY RESOURCE COORDINATION GROUPS. (a) Each community resource coordination group shall evaluate the provision of systems of care services in the community that the group serves. The evaluation must:

(1) describe and prioritize services needed by children with severe emotional disturbances in the community;

(2) review and assess the available systems of care services in the community to meet those needs;

(3) assess the integration of the provision of those services; and

(4) identify barriers to the effective provision of those services.

(b) Each community resource coordination group shall create a report that includes the evaluation described by Subsection (a) and related recommendations, including:

(1) suggested policy and statutory changes for agencies providing systems of care services; and

(2) recommendations for overcoming barriers to the provision of systems of care services and improving the integration of those services.

(c) Each community resource coordination group shall submit the report described by Subsection (b) to the commission. The commission shall provide to each group a deadline for submitting the report that is coordinated with any regional reviews by the commission of the delivery of related services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0103. SUMMARY REPORT BY COMMISSION. (a) The commission shall create a summary report based on the evaluations in the reports submitted to the commission by community resource coordination groups under Section 547.0102. The commission's report must include:

(1) recommendations for policy and statutory changes at each agency involved in providing systems of care services; and

(2) the outcome expected from implementing each recommendation.

(b) The commission may include in the report created under this section recommendations for:

(1) the statewide expansion of sites participating in the Texas System of Care; and

(2) the integration of services provided at those sites with services provided by community resource coordination groups.

(c) The commission shall coordinate, where appropriate, the recommendations in the report created under this section with:

(1) recommendations in the assessment developed under Chapter 23 (S.B. 491), Acts of the 78th Legislature, Regular Session, 2003; and

(2) the continuum of care developed under Section 533.040(d), Health and Safety Code.

(d) The commission shall provide a copy of the report created under this section to each agency for which the report makes a recommendation and to other agencies as appropriate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0104. AGENCY IMPLEMENTATION OF RECOMMENDATIONS. As appropriate, the person responsible for adopting rules for an agency described by Section 547.0103(a) shall implement the recommendations in the report created under Section 547.0103 by:

(1) adopting rules;

(2) implementing policy changes; and

(3) entering into memoranda of understanding with other agencies.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER D. STATEWIDE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH COORDINATING COUNCIL

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "council" means the statewide behavioral health coordinating council.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0152. PURPOSE. The council is established to ensure a strategic statewide approach to behavioral health services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0153. COMPOSITION OF COUNCIL. (a) The council is composed of at least one representative designated by each of the following entities:

(1) the governor's office;

(2) the Texas Veterans Commission;

(3) the commission;

(4) the Department of State Health Services;

(5) the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(6) the Texas Civil Commitment Office;

(7) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston;

(8) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler;

(9) the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center;

(10) the Texas Department of Criminal Justice;

(11) the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments;

(12) the Commission on Jail Standards;

(13) the Texas Indigent Defense Commission;

(14) the court of criminal appeals;

(15) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(16) the Texas Military Department;

(17) the Texas Education Agency;

(18) the Texas Workforce Commission;

(19) the Health Professions Council, representing:

(A) the State Board of Dental Examiners;

(B) the Texas State Board of Pharmacy;

(C) the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners;

(D) the Texas Optometry Board;

(E) the Texas Board of Nursing; and

(F) the Texas Medical Board; and

(20) the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs.

(b) The executive commissioner shall determine the number of representatives that each entity may designate to serve on the council.

(c) The council may authorize another state agency or institution that provides specific behavioral health services with the use of appropriated money to designate a representative to the council.

(d) A council member serves at the pleasure of the designating entity.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0154. PRESIDING OFFICER. The mental health statewide coordinator shall serve as the presiding officer of the council.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0155. MEETINGS. The council shall meet at least once quarterly or more frequently at the call of the presiding officer.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0156. POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The council:

(1) shall develop and monitor the implementation of a five-year statewide behavioral health strategic plan;

(2) shall develop a biennial coordinated statewide behavioral health expenditure proposal;

(3) shall annually publish an updated inventory of behavioral health programs and services that this state funds that includes a description of how those programs and services further the purpose of the statewide behavioral health strategic plan;

(4) may create subcommittees to carry out the council's duties under this subchapter; and

(5) may facilitate opportunities to increase collaboration for the effective expenditure of available federal and state funds for behavioral and mental health services in this state.

(b) The council shall include statewide suicide prevention efforts in the five-year statewide behavioral health strategic plan the council develops under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0157. SUICIDE PREVENTION SUBCOMMITTEE; SUICIDE DATA REPORTS. (a) The council shall create a suicide prevention subcommittee to focus on statewide suicide prevention efforts using information collected by the council from available sources of suicide data reports. The suicide prevention subcommittee shall establish guidelines for the frequent use of those reports in carrying out the council's purpose under this subchapter.

(b) The suicide prevention subcommittee shall establish a method for identifying how suicide data reports are used to make policy.

(c) Public or private entities that collect information regarding suicide and suicide prevention may provide suicide data reports to commission staff the executive commissioner designates to receive those reports.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER E. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH GRANT PROGRAMS GENERALLY

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0201. STREAMLINING PROCESS FOR AWARDING BEHAVIORAL HEALTH GRANTS. (a) The commission shall implement a process to better coordinate behavioral health grants the commission administers. The process must:

(1) streamline the administrative processes at the commission; and

(2) decrease the administrative burden on applicants applying for multiple grants.

(b) The process may include developing a standard application for multiple behavioral health grants.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER F. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FOR CERTAIN COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAMS ASSISTING INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING MENTAL ILLNESS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0251. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "matching grant program" means the matching grant program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0252. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM. To the extent money is appropriated to the commission for that purpose, the commission shall establish a matching grant program to support community mental health programs providing services and treatment to individuals experiencing mental illness.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0253. MATCHING CONTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED; GRANT CONDITIONS. (a) The commission shall:

(1) condition each grant awarded under this subchapter on the grant recipient obtaining and securing funds to match the grant from non-state sources in amounts of money or other consideration as required by Subsection (c); and

(2) ensure that each grant recipient obtains or secures contributions to match a grant awarded to the recipient in an amount of money or other consideration as required by Subsection (c).

(b) The matching contributions obtained or secured by the grant recipient, as the executive commissioner determines, may include cash or in-kind contributions from any person but may not include money from state or federal funds.

(c) A grant recipient must leverage funds in an amount equal to:

(1) 25 percent of the grant amount if the community mental health program is located in a county with a population of less than 100,000;

(2) 50 percent of the grant amount if the community mental health program is located in a county with a population of 100,000 or more but less than 250,000;

(3) 100 percent of the grant amount if the community mental health program is located in a county with a population of at least 250,000; and

(4) the percentage of the grant amount otherwise required by this subsection for the largest county in which a community mental health program is located if the community mental health program is located in more than one county.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0254. SELECTION OF RECIPIENTS; APPLICATIONS AND PROPOSALS. The commission shall select grant recipients based on the submission of applications or proposals by nonprofit and governmental entities. The executive commissioner shall develop criteria for evaluating those applications or proposals and the selection of grant recipients. The selection criteria must:

(1) evaluate and score:

(A) fiscal controls for the project;

(B) project effectiveness;

(C) project cost; and

(D) an applicant's previous experience with grants and contracts;

(2) address whether the services proposed in the application or proposal would duplicate services already available in the applicant's service area;

(3) address the possibility of and method for making multiple awards; and

(4) include other factors that the executive commissioner considers relevant.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0255. LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITY INVOLVEMENT. (a) A nonprofit or governmental entity that applies for a grant under this subchapter must:

(1) notify each local mental health authority with a local service area covered wholly or partly by the entity's proposed community mental health program; and

(2) provide in the entity's application a letter of support from each of those local mental health authorities.

(b) The commission shall consider a local mental health authority's written input before awarding a grant under this subchapter and may take any recommendations made by the authority.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0256. USE OF GRANTS AND MATCHING AMOUNTS. A grant awarded under the matching grant program and matching amounts must be used for the sole purpose of supporting community mental health programs that:

(1) provide mental health services and treatment to individuals with a mental illness; and

(2) coordinate mental health services for individuals with a mental illness with other transition support services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0257. DISTRIBUTING AND ALLOCATING APPROPRIATED MONEY. (a) The commission shall disburse money appropriated to or obtained by the commission for the matching grant program directly to a grant recipient, as the executive commissioner authorizes.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), from money appropriated to the commission for each fiscal year to implement this subchapter, the commission shall reserve 50 percent of that total to be awarded only as grants to a community mental health program located in a county with a population not greater than 250,000.

(c) Without regard to the limitation provided by Subsection (b) and to the extent money appropriated to the commission to implement this subchapter for a fiscal year remains available to the commission after the commission selects grant recipients for the fiscal year, the commission shall make grants available through a competitive request for proposal process using the remaining money for the fiscal year.

(d) The commission may use a reasonable amount not to exceed five percent of the money appropriated by the legislature for the purposes of this subchapter to pay the administrative costs of implementing this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0258. RULES. The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement the matching grant program under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0259. BIENNIAL REPORT. Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the executive commissioner shall submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, and each member of the legislature a report evaluating the success of the matching grant program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER G. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FOR COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAMS ASSISTING VETERANS AND THEIR FAMILIES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0301. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "matching grant program" means the matching grant program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0302. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM. To the extent funds are appropriated to the commission for that purpose, the commission shall establish a matching grant program to support community mental health programs that provide services and treatment to veterans and their families.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0303. MATCHING CONTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED. (a) The commission shall ensure that each grant recipient obtains or secures contributions to match a grant awarded to the recipient in amounts of money or other consideration as required by Section 547.0304 or 547.0305.

(b) The money or other consideration obtained or secured by the commission may, as the executive commissioner determines, include cash or in-kind contributions from private contributors or local governments but may not include state or federal funds.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0304. MATCHING GRANT CONDITIONS: SINGLE COUNTIES. For services and treatment provided in a single county, the commission shall condition each grant provided under this subchapter on a potential grant recipient providing funds from non-state sources in a total amount at least equal to:

(1) 25 percent of the grant amount if the community mental health program to be supported by the grant provides services and treatment in a county with a population of less than 100,000;

(2) 50 percent of the grant amount if the community mental health program to be supported by the grant provides services and treatment in a county with a population of 100,000 or more but less than 250,000; or

(3) 100 percent of the grant amount if the community mental health program to be supported by the grant provides services and treatment in a county with a population of 250,000 or more.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0305. MATCHING GRANT CONDITIONS: MULTIPLE COUNTIES. For a community mental health program that provides services and treatment in more than one county, the commission shall condition each grant provided under this subchapter on a potential grant recipient providing funds from non-state sources in a total amount at least equal to:

(1) 25 percent of the grant amount if the county with the largest population in which the community mental health program to be supported by the grant provides services and treatment has a population of less than 100,000;

(2) 50 percent of the grant amount if the county with the largest population in which the community mental health program to be supported by the grant provides services and treatment has a population of 100,000 or more but less than 250,000; or

(3) 100 percent of the grant amount if the county with the largest population in which the community mental health program to be supported by the grant provides services and treatment has a population of 250,000 or more.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0306. SELECTION OF RECIPIENTS; APPLICATIONS AND PROPOSALS. (a) The commission shall select grant recipients based on the submission of applications or proposals by nonprofit and governmental entities.

(b) The executive commissioner shall develop criteria for evaluating the applications or proposals and the selection of grant recipients. The selection criteria must:

(1) evaluate and score:

(A) fiscal controls for the project;

(B) project effectiveness;

(C) project cost; and

(D) an applicant's previous experience with grants and contracts;

(2) address the possibility of and method for making multiple awards; and

(3) include other factors that the executive commissioner considers relevant.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0307. USE OF GRANTS AND MATCHING AMOUNTS. A grant awarded under the matching grant program must be used for the sole purpose of supporting community mental health programs that:

(1) provide mental health services and treatment to veterans and their families; and

(2) coordinate mental health services for veterans and their families with other transition support services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0308. DISTRIBUTING AND ALLOCATING APPROPRIATED MONEY. (a) As the executive commissioner authorizes, the commission shall disburse money appropriated to or obtained by the commission for the matching grant program directly to grant recipients.

(b) The commission may use a reasonable amount not to exceed five percent of the money appropriated by the legislature for the purposes of this subchapter to pay the administrative costs of implementing this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0309. RULES. The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement the matching grant program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER H. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FOR CERTAIN COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVES TO REDUCE INVOLVEMENT OF INDIVIDUALS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS IN CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0351. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "matching grant program" means the matching grant program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0352. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM. The commission shall establish a matching grant program to provide grants to county-based community collaboratives to reduce:

(1) recidivism by, the frequency of arrests of, and incarceration of individuals with mental illness; and

(2) the total wait time for forensic commitment of individuals with mental illness to a state hospital.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0353. MATCHING CONTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED; GRANT CONDITIONS. (a) The commission shall condition each grant provided to a community collaborative under this subchapter on the collaborative providing funds from non-state sources in a total amount at least equal to:

(1) 25 percent of the grant amount if the collaborative includes a county with a population of less than 100,000;

(2) 50 percent of the grant amount if the collaborative includes a county with a population of 100,000 or more but less than 250,000;

(3) 100 percent of the grant amount if the collaborative includes a county with a population of 250,000 or more; and

(4) the percentage of the grant amount otherwise required by this subsection for the largest county included in the collaborative, if the collaborative includes more than one county.

(b) A community collaborative may seek and receive gifts, grants, or donations from any person to raise the required funds from non-state sources.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0354. COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVE ELIGIBILITY; CERTAIN GRANTS PROHIBITED. (a) A community collaborative may petition the commission to receive a grant under the matching grant program only if the collaborative includes:

(1) a county;

(2) a local mental health authority that operates in the county; and

(3) each hospital district, if any, located in the county.

(b) A collaborative may include other local entities designated by the collaborative's members.

(c) The commission may not award a grant under this subchapter for a fiscal year to a community collaborative that includes a county with a population greater than four million if the legislature appropriates money for a mental health jail diversion program in the county for that fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0355. PETITION REQUIRED; CONTENTS. In each state fiscal year for which a community collaborative seeks a grant, the collaborative must submit a petition to the commission not later than the 30th day of that fiscal year. The collaborative must include with a petition:

(1) a statement indicating the amount of funds from non-state sources that the collaborative is able to provide; and

(2) a plan that:

(A) is endorsed by each of the collaborative's member entities;

(B) identifies a target population;

(C) describes how the grant money and the funds from non-state sources will be used;

(D) includes outcome measures to evaluate the success of the plan; and

(E) describes how the success of the plan, in accordance with the outcome measures, would further the state's interest in the grant program's purposes.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0356. REVIEW OF PETITION BY COMMISSION. The commission must review plans submitted with a petition under Section 547.0355 before the commission provides a grant under this subchapter. The commission must fulfill this requirement not later than the 60th day of each fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0357. USE OF GRANT MONEY AND MATCHING FUNDS. Acceptable uses of the grant money and matching funds include:

(1) continuing a mental health jail diversion program;

(2) establishing or expanding a mental health jail diversion program;

(3) establishing alternatives to competency restoration in a state hospital, including outpatient competency restoration, inpatient competency restoration in a setting other than a state hospital, or jail-based competency restoration;

(4) providing assertive community treatment or forensic assertive community treatment with an outreach component;

(5) providing intensive mental health services and substance use treatment not readily available in the county;

(6) providing continuity of care services for an individual being released from a state hospital;

(7) establishing interdisciplinary rapid response teams to reduce law enforcement's involvement with mental health emergencies; and

(8) providing local community hospital, crisis, respite, or residential beds.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0358. REPORT BY COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVE. Not later than the 90th day after the last day of the state fiscal year for which the commission distributes a grant under this subchapter, each grant recipient shall prepare and submit a report to the commission describing the effect of the grant money and matching funds in achieving the standard defined by the outcome measures in the plan submitted with a petition under Section 547.0355.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0359. INSPECTIONS. The commission may inspect the operation and provision of mental health services provided by a community collaborative to ensure state money appropriated for the matching grant program is used effectively.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0360. ALLOCATING APPROPRIATED MONEY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the commission shall reserve at least 20 percent of money appropriated to the commission for each fiscal year to implement the matching grant program to be awarded only as grants to a community collaborative that includes a county with a population of less than 250,000.

(b) Without regard to the limitation provided by Subsection (a) and to the extent money appropriated to the commission for a fiscal year to implement this subchapter remains available to the commission after the commission has selected grant recipients for the fiscal year, the commission shall make grants available through a competitive request for proposal process using the remaining money for the fiscal year.

(c) The commission may use a reasonable amount not to exceed five percent of the money appropriated by the legislature for the purposes of this subchapter to pay the administrative costs of implementing this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER I. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FOR COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVE IN MOST POPULOUS COUNTY TO REDUCE INVOLVEMENT OF INDIVIDUALS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS IN CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0401. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "matching grant program" means the matching grant program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0402. MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM. The commission shall establish a matching grant program to provide a grant to a county-based community collaborative in the most populous county in this state to reduce:

(1) recidivism by, the frequency of arrests of, and incarceration of individuals with mental illness; and

(2) the total wait time for forensic commitment of individuals with mental illness to a state hospital.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0403. MATCHING CONTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED; GRANT CONDITIONS. (a) The commission shall condition a grant provided to the community collaborative under this subchapter on the collaborative providing funds from non-state sources in a total amount at least equal to the grant amount.

(b) A community collaborative may seek and receive gifts, grants, or donations from any person to raise the required funds from non-state sources.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0404. COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVE ELIGIBILITY. (a) A community collaborative may receive a grant under the matching grant program only if the collaborative includes:

(1) the county;

(2) a local mental health authority operating in the county; and

(3) each hospital district located in the county.

(b) A collaborative may include other local entities designated by the collaborative's members.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0405. DISTRIBUTION OF GRANT. Not later than the 30th day of each fiscal year, the commission shall make available to the community collaborative established in the county described by Section 547.0402 a grant in an amount equal to the lesser of:

(1) the amount appropriated to the commission for that fiscal year for a mental health jail diversion pilot program in that county; or

(2) the collaborative's available matching funds.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0406. USE OF GRANT MONEY AND MATCHING FUNDS. Acceptable uses of the grant money and matching funds include:

(1) continuing a mental health jail diversion program;

(2) establishing or expanding a mental health jail diversion program;

(3) establishing alternatives to competency restoration in a state hospital, including outpatient competency restoration, inpatient competency restoration in a setting other than a state hospital, or jail-based competency restoration;

(4) providing assertive community treatment or forensic assertive community treatment with an outreach component;

(5) providing intensive mental health services and substance use treatment not readily available in the county;

(6) providing continuity of care services for an individual being released from a state hospital;

(7) establishing interdisciplinary rapid response teams to reduce law enforcement's involvement with mental health emergencies; and

(8) providing local community hospital, crisis, respite, or residential beds.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0407. REPORT BY COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVE. Not later than the 90th day after the last day of the state fiscal year for which the commission distributes a grant under this subchapter, the grant recipient shall prepare and submit a report to the commission describing the effect of the grant money and matching funds in fulfilling the purpose described by Section 547.0402.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 547.0408. INSPECTIONS. The commission may inspect the operation and provision of mental health services provided by the community collaborative to ensure state money appropriated for the matching grant program is used effectively.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.